Utah statutes.
48-2c-1509 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Additional requirements for articles of organization.

The articles of organization of a professional services company shall satisfy the requirements of Section 48-2c-403 and, in addition thereto, shall contain the following:

(1)  a name consistent with Section 48-2c-1505;

(2)  a description of the profession to be practiced through the company; and

(3)  notwithstanding Subsection 48-2c-403(2), the names and street addresses of all members and managers of the company.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

